Nebraska, session 109, LB554.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB554 LB554
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 71-6207, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-6207 Commission Committee shall mean the Nebraska Health
Professions Commission technical committee created in section 71-6224.
Sec. 2. Section 71-6207.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-6207.02 Directed review shall mean a review conducted pursuant to
section 71-6223.02 in which (1) there is no applicant group or
application, (2) the duty of the commission committee is to formulate an
initial proposal on the issues subject to review, and (3) the duty of the
board and the director is to evaluate the proposal using the appropriate
criteria and to make recommendations to the Legislature.
Sec. 3. Section 71-6219.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-6219.01 Review body shall mean the commission committee, the
board, or the director charged with reviewing applications for new
credentialing or change in scope of practice.
Sec. 4. Section 71-6223.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-6223.02 (1) At any time the director and the chairperson may
initiate a directed review or the chairperson in consultation with the
members of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature may
initiate a directed review. The purpose of a directed review is to
determine the advisability of credentialing a health professional group
not previously regulated, of changing the scope of practice of a
regulated health profession, or of other issues regarding the regulation
of health professions.
(2) The commission shall review scope of practice proposals or
proposals seeking to credential new health professions. The commission
may initiate proposals for scope of practice reviews. Before making a
decision, the commission shall consider the impact on public health and
-2-

LB554 LB554
2025 2025
safety, including data on workforce shortages, health care quality,
access to health care services, and patient affordability and shall
conduct public factfinding hearings.
(3) Recommendations of the commission shall be forwarded to the
Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature no later than
October 1 each year for action during the following legislative session.
(4) The commission shall detail its findings in a report and file
the report with the board, the director, and the chairperson of the
Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature. The commission
shall evaluate each application presented on the basis of the criteria
set forth in sections 71-6221 to 71-6223 and shall make written findings
and a recommendation for approval or denial. Regardless of whether the
commission recommends approval or denial of an application, it may make
additional recommendations for changes to the proposal or other solutions
to address problems identified during the review and may comment on the
anticipated benefits to the health, safety, and welfare of the public.
Before initiating a directed review, the director and the chairperson, or
the chairperson in consultation with the Health and Human Services
Committee, shall determine that no appropriate applicant group exists. No
letter of intent, applicant group, application, or application fee shall
be required in a directed review. The duty of the technical committee in
a directed review shall be to investigate the issues that are the subject
of the review, to hold a public hearing to receive information from the
public on the issues, to develop a specific proposal to address the
issues investigated taking into account the appropriate criteria as set
forth in section 71-6221, and to prepare a final report containing the
technical committee's proposal, other options considered, and other
relevant information.
Sec. 5. Section 71-6224, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-6224 (1) The Nebraska Health Professions Commission is created as
-3-

LB554 LB554
2025 2025
the body responsible for reviewing applications and conducting directed
reviews as described in sections 71-6221 to 71-6223.
(2)(a) The commission shall be co-chaired by a representative from a
college of public health at Nebraska's largest postsecondary educational
institution with a college of medicine and a representative from a
research institute focused on population health that operates under the
auspice of a different postsecondary educational institution with a
college of medicine in Nebraska.
(b) Other members shall include (i) the chief medical officer of the
Department of Health and Human Services or designee, (ii) the chairperson
of the State Board of Health or designee, and (iii) no more than seven
additional members designated by the co-chairs of the commission, of whom
no more than four shall reside in the three most populous counties in
Nebraska and no more than two shall be from the same regulated health
profession, subject to legislative approval.
(3) The commission shall comply with the Open Meetings Act and shall
hold public hearings to receive information from stakeholders and the
public.
(4) The commission shall serve as a factfinding body to investigate
proposals for credentialing health professions or changing scope of
practice regulations. The commission shall:
(a) Evaluate proposals based on the criteria established in sections
71-6221 to 71-6223;
(b) Collect and analyze relevant data, including workforce trends,
public health impacts, health care quality, and affordability; and
(c) Hold public hearings to ensure transparency and inclusivity.
(5) The commission may monitor and evaluate health care quality and
public health impact of any recommended changes enacted by the
Legislature.
(6) The commission may also initiate its own proposals for scope-of-
practice reviews or credentialing.
-4-

LB554 LB554
2025 2025
(7) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate three hundred
thousand dollars annually to the commission to support its activities,
including data collection, analysis, preparation of reports, and
organizing meetings. Of this amount, one hundred thousand dollars shall
be allocated to support the Health Professions Tracking Service of the
University of Nebraska Medical Center in collecting data on practice
locations and scope of practice for credentialed health professionals.
These findings shall be included in the commission's annual report.
(8) The commission shall submit an electronic report detailing its
findings, conclusions, and recommendations to the director, the Speaker
of the Legislature, and the chairperson of the Health and Human Services
Committee of the Legislature. The report shall include the results of
data collection and analysis, a summary of public hearings, and any
additional insights or recommendations.
(9) The commission shall not be involved in the implementation of
scope-of-practice changes or credentialing new health professions. These
responsibilities shall remain with the appropriate state licensing
authority, which is tasked with setting standards for training,
competency, and evaluation.
(10) No member of the commission shall be permitted to vote on
matters directly affecting a member's regulated health profession, an
applicant group to which the member belongs, or a health profession
seeking to be regulated.
(1) The director with the advice of the board shall appoint an
appropriate technical committee to examine and investigate each
application. The committee shall consist of six appointed members and one
member of the board designated by the board who shall serve as
chairperson of the committee. The chairperson of the committee shall not
be a member of the applicant group, any health profession sought to be
regulated by the application, or any health profession which is directly
or indirectly affected by the application. The director shall ensure that
-5-

LB554 LB554
2025 2025
the total composition of the committee is fair, impartial, and equitable.
In no event shall more than one member of the same regulated health
profession, the applicant group, or the health profession sought to be
regulated by an application serve on a technical committee.
(2) As soon as possible after its appointment, the committee shall
meet and review the application assigned to it. The committee shall serve
as a factfinding body and undertake such investigation as it deems
necessary to address the issues identified in the application. As part of
its investigation, each committee shall consider available scientific
evidence and conduct public factfinding hearings. Each committee shall
comply with the Open Meetings Act.
(3) An applicant group shall have the burden of producing evidence
to support its application.
(11) The commission (4) Each committee shall detail its findings in
a report and file the report with the board and the director. The
commission Each committee shall evaluate the application presented to it
on the basis of the appropriate criteria as established in sections
71-6221 to 71-6223, shall make written findings on all criteria, and
shall make a recommendation for approval or denial. Whether it recommends
approval or denial of an application, the commission committee may make
additional recommendations regarding changes to the proposal or other
solutions to problems identified during the review and may comment on the
anticipated benefits to the health, safety, and welfare of the public. If
the commission committee recommends approval of an application for
regulation of a health profession not currently regulated, it shall also
recommend the least restrictive method of regulation to be implemented
consistent with the cost-effective protection of the public and with
section 71-6222. The commission committee may recommend a specific method
of regulation not listed in section 71-6222 if it finds that such method
is the best alternative method of regulation.
Sec. 6. Section 71-6225, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-6-

LB554 LB554
2025 2025
amended to read:
71-6225 The board shall receive reports from the commission
technical committees and shall meet to review and discuss each report.
The board shall apply the criteria established in sections 71-6221 to
71-6223 and compile its own report, including its findings and
recommendations, and submit such report, together with the commission
committee report, to the director. The recommendation of the board shall
be developed in a manner consistent with subsection (4) of section
71-6224.
Sec. 7. Section 71-6226, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-6226 (1) After receiving and considering reports from the
commission committee or the board, the director shall prepare a final
report for the Legislature. The final report shall include copies of the
commission committee report and the board report, if any, but the
director shall not be bound by the findings and recommendations of such
reports. The director in compiling his or her report shall apply the
criteria established in sections 71-6221 to 71-6223 and may consult with
the board or the commission committee. The recommendation of the director
shall be developed in a manner consistent with subsection (4) of section
71-6224. The final report shall be submitted electronically to the
Speaker of the Legislature, the chairperson Chairperson of the Executive
Board of the Legislature, and the chairperson Chairperson of the Health
and Human Services Committee of the Legislature no later than twelve
months after the application is submitted to the director and found to be
complete and shall be made available electronically to all other members
of the Legislature upon request.
(2) The director may recommend that no legislative action be taken
on an application. If the director recommends that an application of an
applicant group be approved, the director shall recommend an agency to be
responsible for the regulation and the level of regulation to be assigned
-7-

LB554 LB554
2025 2025
to such applicant group.
(3) An application which is resubmitted shall be considered the same
as a new application.
Sec. 8. Section 71-6227, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-6227 (1) The director may, with the advice of the board, adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Nebraska
Regulation of Health Professions Act.
(2) The director shall provide all necessary professional and
clerical services to assist the commission committees and the board.
Records of all official actions and minutes of all business coming before
the commission committees and the board shall be kept. The director shall
be the custodian of all records, documents, and other property of the
commission committees and the board.
(3) Commission Committee members shall receive no salary but shall
be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
Sec. 9. Original sections 71-6207, 71-6207.02, 71-6219.01,
71-6223.02, 71-6224, 71-6225, and 71-6226, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 71-6227, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-8-